Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1133.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5729(a) of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5729. Misbranding of food.(a) General rule.--A food shall be misbranded:* * *(13) If it bears or contains Butylated Hydroxyanisole (CAS 25013-16-5) unless it bears the following warning, in boldface type, on the principal display panel and in a type size no smaller than the type size used for the "serving size" declaration required by Federal law:12345678910111213141516 WARNING: This product contains BHA, which may cause cancer.* * *(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "CAS" means the unique accession number assigned by the Chemical Abstracts Service, a division of the American Chemical Society, as of the effective date of this section, to a substance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB1133PN1418 - 2 - 12345678